California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) After certification of its local coastal program, each respective local government shall be reimbursed for costs associated with implementation of that local coastal program as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 30350) of Chapter 4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 17.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30600.6.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall apply:

(1) “Applicant” means a public agency or a nonprofit organization, as that term is defined in Section 31013.

(2) “Habitat restoration project” means a project proposed for the sole purpose of restoring or enhancing the ecological function, biodiversity, or resiliency of native habitat. 

(3) “Public access project” means a project with the primary purpose of creating, enhancing, expanding, or restoring public amenities that provide access to or along the coast.

(b) At the request of an applicant for a coastal development permit, a city or county may waive or reduce a coastal development permit fee for a public access project or habitat restoration project.
 If a city or county rejects a fee waiver or fee reduction request, the applicant may, notwithstanding Section 30519, submit the coastal development permit application directly to the commission.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impact, address, or change a local coastal plan or program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   (AB 2160)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30600.7.

Where, prior to delegation of coastal permit authority pursuant to Section 30519, a modification of a refinery facility or petrochemical facility is necessary to comply with a goal, policy, or requirement of an air pollution control district, the State Air Resources Board, or the Environmental Protection Agency to provide for reformulated or alternative fuels, that modification shall require a coastal development permit from the commission only, notwithstanding the option afforded local governments under subdivision (b) of Section 30600.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 535, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30601.

Prior to certification of the local coastal program and, where applicable, in addition to a permit from local government pursuant to subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 30600, a coastal development permit shall be obtained from the commission for any of the following:

(1) Developments between the sea and the first public road paralleling the sea or within 300 feet of the inland extent of any beach or of the mean high tide line of the sea where there is no beach, whichever is the greater distance.

(2) Developments not included within paragraph (1) located on tidelands, submerged lands, public trust lands, within 100 feet of any wetland, estuary, stream, or within 300 feet of the top of the seaward face of any coastal bluff.

(3) Any development which constitutes a major public works project or a major energy facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1173, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

30601.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 30519, the commission may process and act upon a consolidated coastal development permit application if both of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) A proposed project requires a coastal development permit from both a local government with a certified local coastal program and the commission.

(2) The applicant, the appropriate local government, and the commission, which may agree through its executive director, consent to consolidate the permit action, provided that public participation is not substantially impaired by that review consolidation.

(b) The standard of review for a consolidated coastal development permit application submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall follow Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200), with the appropriate local coastal program used as guidance.

(c) The application fee for a consolidated coastal development permit shall be determined by reference to the commission’s permit fee schedule.

(d) To implement this section, the commission may adopt guidelines, in the same manner as interpretive guidelines adopted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 30620.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 294, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30601.4.

(a) (1) The commission shall process a consolidated coastal development permit for any new development that requires a coastal development permit and that is associated with, appurtenant to, or necessary for the construction and operation of offshore wind energy projects, and transmission facilities needed for those projects, located in the coastal zone, as defined in this division. Section 30601.3 applies to a consolidated coastal development permit pursuant to this section, except that paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 30601.3 does not apply, and provided that public participation is not substantially impaired by the review of the consolidated coastal development permit.

(2) Upon receipt of an application for
 purposes of this subdivision, the commission shall forward the application to local governmental agencies having land use and related jurisdiction in the area in which the project would occur. The local governmental agencies may review the application and submit comments on, among other things, applicable provisions of the local coastal program and other appropriate aspects of the design, construction, or operation of the proposed site and related facility.

(3) The commission shall coordinate with affected local governmental agencies to incorporate or otherwise address their recommendations in the final consolidated coastal development permit, including measures to address impacts from offshore wind development and respond to community needs, consistent with this division.

(4) The commission shall engage with federally recognized and nonfederally recognized California Native
 American tribes with fisheries that could be affected by future development associated with a lease for an offshore wind energy project on all elements of the lessees’ project development process, including measures to address impacts from offshore wind development and respond to community needs, consistent with the commission’s tribal consultation policy.

(5) To avoid duplication and to increase regulatory efficiency, the commission and the State Lands Commission shall coordinate with relevant local, state, and federal agencies to encourage and facilitate the preparation of joint environmental documents pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) and the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) for projects proposed pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) The State Lands
 Commission shall be the lead agency for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act for offshore wind energy projects pursuant to this division and shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, all environmental documents required by law.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not affect the determination of which entity shall serve as a lead agency for the purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act for projects undertaken pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 30700).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 386, Sec. 3.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30601.5.

Where the applicant for a coastal development permit is not the owner of a fee interest in the property on which a proposed development is to be located, but can demonstrate a legal right, interest, or other entitlement to use the property for the proposed development, the commission shall not require the holder or owner of any superior interest in the property to join the applicant as coapplicant. All holders or owners of any other interests of record in the affected property shall be notified in writing of the permit application and invited to join as coapplicant. In addition, prior to the issuance of a coastal development permit, the applicant shall demonstrate the authority to comply with all conditions of approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 18.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30602.

Prior to certification of its local coastal program, any action taken by a local government on a coastal development permit application may be appealed by the executive director of the commission, any person, including the applicant, or any two members of the commission to the commission. The action shall become final at the close of business on the 20th working day from the date of receipt of the notice required by subdivision (c) of Section 30620.5, unless an appeal is submitted within that time. Regardless of whether an appeal is submitted, the local government’s action shall become final if an appeal fee is imposed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30620 and is not deposited with the commission within the time prescribed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 669, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

30603.

(a) After certification of its local coastal program, an action taken by a local government on a coastal development permit application may be appealed to the commission for only the following types of developments:

(1) Developments approved by the local government between the sea and the first public road paralleling the sea or within 300 feet of the inland extent of any beach or of the mean high tideline of the sea where there is no beach, whichever is the greater distance.

(2) Developments approved by the local government not included within paragraph (1) that are located on tidelands, submerged lands, public trust lands, within 100 feet of any wetland, estuary, or stream, or within 300 feet of the
 top of the seaward face of any coastal bluff.

(3) (A) Developments approved by the local government not included within paragraph (1) or (2) that are located in a sensitive coastal resource area.

(B) This paragraph shall not apply to a residential development project.

(4) (A) Any development approved by a coastal county that is not designated as the principal permitted use under the zoning ordinance or zoning district map approved pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500).

(B) This paragraph shall not apply to a residential development project.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “coastal county” shall not include a local government
 that is both a city and county.

(5) Any development that constitutes a major public works project or a major energy facility.

(b) (1) The grounds for an appeal pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be limited to an allegation that the development does not conform to the standards set forth in the certified local coastal program or the public access policies set forth in this division.

(2) The grounds for an appeal of a denial of a permit pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) shall be limited to an allegation that the development conforms to the standards set forth in the certified local coastal program and the public access policies set forth in this division.

(c) An action described in subdivision (a) shall become final at the
 close of business on the 10th working day from the date of receipt by the commission of the notice of the local government’s final action, unless an appeal is submitted within that time. Regardless of whether an appeal is submitted, the local government’s action shall become final if an appeal fee is imposed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30620 and is not deposited with the commission within the time prescribed.

(d) (1) A local government taking an action on a coastal development permit shall send notification of its final action to the commission by certified mail, or by electronic mail pursuant to paragraph (2), within seven calendar days from the date of taking the action.

(2) (A) In order for a local government to notify the commission via electronic mail of an action on a coastal development permit, the notification shall be
 sent from a verifiable local government electronic mail account, and shall be received in the electronic mailbox designated by the commission on its internet website for receipt of that notification.

(B) For the purposes of determining the 10th working day from the date of receipt of notice by the commission under subdivision (c), notice received by the commission by electronic mail after the close of business shall be considered received on the next working day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 64.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30603.1.

(a) In any city and county which so requests, the commission may adjust the inland boundary of the area within which the issuance of coastal development permits may be appealed to the commission pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 30603. Any such adjustment shall be made solely to avoid the circumstance of having the boundary of that area bisect an individual parcel of property. The adjustment may be made landward or seaward, but shall be the minimum distance necessary, consistent with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200), to avoid bisecting a parcel of property.

(b) If the commission subsequently finds that the circumstances which warranted a boundary adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a) have changed, it may, after notice to the city and county, readjust the boundary so that it is consistent with the changed circumstances. The requirements of subdivision (a) shall apply to any such boundary adjustment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 20.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30604.

(a) Prior to certification of the local coastal program, a coastal development permit shall be issued if the issuing agency, or the commission on appeal, finds that the proposed development is in conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) and that the permitted development will not prejudice the ability of the local government to prepare a local coastal program that is in conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200). A denial of a coastal development permit on grounds it would prejudice the ability of the local government to prepare a local coastal program that is in conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) shall be accompanied by a specific finding that sets forth the basis for that conclusion.

(b) After certification of the local coastal program, a coastal development permit shall be issued if the issuing agency, or the commission on appeal, finds that the proposed development is in conformity with the certified local coastal program.

(c) Every coastal development permit issued for any development between the nearest public road and the sea or the shoreline of any body of water located within the coastal zone shall include a specific finding that the development is in conformity with the public access and public recreation policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

(d) No development or any portion thereof that is outside the coastal zone shall be subject to the coastal development permit requirements of this division, nor shall anything in this division authorize the denial of a coastal
 development permit by the commission on the grounds the proposed development within the coastal zone will have an adverse environmental effect outside the coastal zone.

(e) No coastal development permit may be denied under this division on the grounds that a public agency is planning or contemplating to acquire the property, or property adjacent to the property, on which the proposed development is to be located, unless the public agency has been specifically authorized to acquire the property and there are funds available, or funds that could reasonably be expected to be made available within one year, for the acquisition. If a permit has been denied for that reason and the property has not been acquired by a public agency within a reasonable period of time, a permit may not be denied for the development on grounds that the property, or adjacent property, is to be acquired by a public agency when the application for such a development is
 resubmitted.

(f) The commission shall encourage housing opportunities for persons of low and moderate income. In reviewing residential development applications for low- and moderate-income housing, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code, the issuing agency, or the commission on appeal, may not require measures that reduce residential densities below the density sought by an applicant if the density sought is within the permitted density or range of density established by local zoning plus the additional density permitted under Section 65915 of the Government Code, unless the issuing agency or the commission on appeal makes a finding, based on substantial evidence in the record, that the density sought by the applicant cannot feasibly be accommodated on the site in a manner that is in conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) or the certified local coastal program.

(g) The Legislature finds and declares that it is important for the commission to encourage the protection of existing and the provision of new affordable housing opportunities for persons of low and moderate income in the coastal zone.

(h) When acting on a coastal development permit, the issuing agency, or the commission on appeal, may consider environmental justice, or the equitable distribution of environmental benefits throughout the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 578, Sec. 4.   (AB 2616)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

30605.

(a) To promote greater efficiency for the planning of any public works or state university or college or private university development projects, and as an alternative to project-by-project review, public works plans or state university or college or private university long-range development plans may be submitted to the commission for review in the same manner prescribed for the review of local coastal programs as set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500).

(b) If a public works plan or long-range development plan is submitted before certification of the local coastal programs for the jurisdictions affected by the proposed plan, the commission shall certify whether the proposed plan is consistent with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

(c) The commission shall, by regulation, provide for the submission and distribution to the public, before public hearings on a proposed public works plan or long-range development plan, detailed environmental information sufficient to enable the commission to determine the consistency of the plan with the policies of this division.

(d) If a public works plan is submitted after the certification of local coastal programs, the plan shall be certified by the commission only if it finds, after full consultation with the affected local governments, that the proposed plan is in conformity with certified local coastal programs in jurisdictions affected by the proposed public works.

(e) Each state university or college or private university shall coordinate and consult with local government in the preparation of long-range
 development plans so as to be consistent, to the fullest extent feasible, with the appropriate local coastal program.

(f) Where a public works plan or long-range development plan has been certified by the commission, any subsequent review by the commission of a specific project contained in the certified plan shall be limited to imposing conditions consistent with Sections 30607 and 30607.1.

(g) (1) When considering the certification of, or an amendment to, a long-range development plan, the commission shall prioritize the provision of active transportation and public transportation facilities over vehicle parking spaces.

(2) For student, faculty, or staff housing facilities proposed for inclusion in a long-range development plan, or subject to commission review under a long-range development
 plan, the commission shall defer to the state university or college or private university in determining the number of vehicle parking spaces necessary for residents of those facilities.

(h) A certified long-range development plan may be amended by the state university or college or private university, but no amendment shall take effect until it has been certified by the commission. Any proposed amendment shall be submitted to, and processed by, the commission in the same manner as prescribed for amendment of a local coastal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   (AB 357)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30605.1.

(a) The executive director of the commission may determine that a proposed amendment to a public works plan or long-range development plan submitted by a state university or college or private university is de minimis if the executive director determines that the proposed amendment would have no impact, either individually or cumulatively, on coastal resources and is consistent with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

(b) (1) The executive director shall make a determination as to whether the proposed amendment is de minimis within 10 working days of the date of a complete submittal by the state university or college or private university. If the proposed amendment is determined to be de minimis, the
 proposed amendment shall be noticed in the agenda of the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission.

(2) If three members of the commission object to the executive director’s determination that the proposed amendment is de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be set for public hearing in accordance with the procedures specified by regulation for amendments to public works plans and long-range development plans or, at the request of the state university or college or private university, be returned to the state university or college or private university. If the proposed amendment is set for public hearing, any applicable time requirements shall commence from the date on which the objection to the de minimis determination was made.

(3) If three or more members of the commission do not object to the de minimis determination, the amendment shall become part of the certified
 public works plan or long-range development plan upon adjournment of the commission meeting on that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 256, Sec. 2.   (AB 357)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30605.2.

The commission shall track and publish on a public portion of its internet website any public works plans or long-range development plans, amendments to public works plans or long-range development plans, and notices of impending development submitted by a state university or college or private university to the commission for approval. Information provided to the public shall include at least a description of the plan, plan amendment, or notice of impending development, the status of the plan, plan amendment, or notice of impending development in the approval process, any conditions imposed by the commission for approval of the plan, plan amendment, or notice of impending development, and the length of time to approval or denial of the plan, plan amendment, or notice of impending development. Information on the internet website
 shall be updated no less than monthly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 256, Sec. 3.   (AB 357)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30606.

Prior to the commencement of any development pursuant to Section 30605, the public agency proposing the public works project, or state university or college or private university, shall notify the commission and other interested persons, organizations, and governmental agencies of the impending development and provide data to show that it is consistent with the certified public works plan or long-range development plan. No development shall take place within 30 working days after the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 600, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30607.

Any permit that is issued or any development or action approved on appeal, pursuant to this chapter, shall be subject to reasonable terms and conditions in order to ensure that such development or action will be in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30607.1.

Where any dike and fill development is permitted in wetlands in conformity with Section 30233 or other applicable policies set forth in this division, mitigation measures shall include, at a minimum, either acquisition of equivalent areas of equal or greater biological productivity or opening up equivalent areas to tidal action; provided, however, that if no appropriate restoration site is available, an in-lieu fee sufficient to provide an area of equivalent productive value or surface areas shall be dedicated to an appropriate public agency, or the replacement site shall be purchased before the dike or fill development may proceed. The mitigation measures shall not be required for temporary or short-term fill or diking if a bond or other evidence of financial responsibility is provided to assure that restoration will be accomplished in the shortest feasible time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1088, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

30607.2.

(a) Conditions requiring housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, which were incorporated into a coastal development permit issued prior to January 1, 1982, may, at the request of the permittee, be amended or modified by the commission or by a local government having the authority to issue coastal development permits. In approving those amendments or modifications, only those conditions and requirements authorized by Section 65590 of the Government Code may be imposed on the permittee.

(b) Any person who, prior to January 1, 1982, has been issued a coastal development permit which contains requirements for low- and moderate-income housing but who, prior to January 1, 1982, has not performed substantial work on the development site (such as grading, installation of streets, sewers, or utilities, or construction of major buildings) may elect to proceed under either of the following options:

(1) To proceed pursuant to all of the requirements of the coastal development permit, in which event the provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply to any subsequent request to amend or alter the coastal development permit in regard to housing requirements.

(2) To proceed without complying with the housing requirements contained in the coastal development permit, in which event the housing requirements for the development shall be governed by Section 65590 of the Government Code.

(c) No new coastal development permit or amendment to any existing permit for a sewer project shall be denied, restricted, or conditioned by the commission in order to implement housing policies or programs.

(d) Nothing in this section authorizes or requires the modification of or amendment to any terms or conditions of any previously issued coastal development permit which guarantees housing opportunities for persons and families of low or moderate income where the term or condition has been met through an agreement executed and recorded on or before January 1, 1982, between an applicant and the commission. For previously approved or issued permits which involve new construction of less than 10 residential units, an executed and recorded agreement guaranteeing housing opportunities for persons or families of low or moderate income, which has not been implemented by the transfer of an interest in real property or payment of a fee to a public agency or nonprofit association for the purpose of providing these housing opportunities, shall be voided if the applicant records the notice provided by the executive director of the commission. Further, nothing in this section impairs the commission’s authority to deny, restrict, or condition new permits or amendments to existing permits based on any requirement of this division.

(e) Nothing in this section authorizes or requires the modification of or amendment to any terms or conditions in Permit #P-80-419 issued by the commission with respect to the reservation or administration of sewer capacity for affordable housing in the San Mateo County local coastal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1500, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30607.5.

Within the City of San Diego, the commission shall not impose or adopt any requirements in conflict with the provisions of the plan for the protection of vernal pools approved and adopted by the City of San Diego on June 17, 1980, following consultation with state and federal agencies, and approved and adopted by the United States Army Corps of Engineers in coordination with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 892, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30607.7.

(a) A coastal development permit for sand replenishment requires the project applicant to provide onsite monitoring and supervision during the implementation of the permit.

(b) A permit subject to subdivision (a) may not be issued until the project applicant provides the issuing agency with a plan for onsite monitoring and supervision during the implementation of the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 285, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30607.8.

(a) The commission shall, when assessing or directing the use of any reclaimed in-lieu fees for any coastal development project, consider the lower cost coastal accommodations assessment required to be prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31413.

(b) (1) The commission may reclaim any in-lieu fee assessed that has not been expended within seven years of the date of its deposit with the appropriate entity, and reassign any such fee for use for one or more projects that are consistent with Section 30213, including lower cost coastal accommodations funded under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 31411), if the executive director makes a written determination that the original intent of the in-lieu fee will be
 better utilized by the reassignment to those projects.

(2) This subdivision is not intended, and shall not be construed, to authorize the commission to alter or abrogate coastal development permit conditions in a manner that would violate a provision of this division or any other law.

(c) For purposes of this section, “in-lieu fee” means any fee paid as a condition for issuance of a coastal development permit to mitigate impacts associated with the development of lower cost coastal visitor-serving projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

30608.

No person who has obtained a vested right in a development prior to the effective date of this division or who has obtained a permit from the California Coastal Zone Conservation Commission pursuant to the California Coastal Zone Conservation Act of 1972 (former Division 18 (commencing with Section 27000)) shall be required to secure approval for the development pursuant to this division. However, no substantial change may be made in the development without prior approval having been obtained under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 591.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30609.

Where, prior to January 1, 1977, a permit was issued and expressly made subject to recorded terms and conditions that are not dedications of land or interests in land for the benefit of the public or a public agency pursuant to the California Coastal Zone Conservation Act of 1972 (commencing with Section 27000), the owner of real property which is the subject of such permit may apply for modification or elimination of the recordation of such terms and conditions pursuant to the provisions of this division. Such application shall be made in the same manner as a permit application. In no event, however, shall such a modification or elimination of recordation result in the imposition of terms or conditions which are more restrictive than those imposed at the time of the initial grant of the permit. Unless modified or deleted pursuant to this section, any condition imposed on a permit issued pursuant to the former California Coastal Zone Conservation Act of 1972 (commencing with Section 27000) shall remain in full force and effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30609.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), no state land that is located between the first public road and the sea, with an existing or potential public accessway to or from the sea, or that the commission has formally designated as part of the California Coastal Trail, shall be transferred or sold by the state to any private entity unless the state retains a permanent property interest in the land adequate to provide public access to or along the sea. In any transfer or sale of real property by a state agency to a private entity or person pursuant to this section, the instrument of conveyance created by the state shall require that the private entity or person or the entity or person’s successors or assigns manage the property in such a way as to ensure that existing or potential public access is not diminished. The instrument of conveyance shall further require that any violation of this management requirement shall result in the reversion of the real property to the state.

(b) This section shall not apply to the transfer of state land to a nonprofit organization that exists for the purposes of preserving lands for public use and enjoyment and meets the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 831.5 of the Government Code.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), state lands between the first public road and the sea, that are under the possession and control of the Department of Parks and Recreation or the State Coastal Conservancy, may be transferred or sold if the department or the conservancy makes one or more of the following findings at a noticed public hearing relating to the transfer or sale of the property:

(1) The state has retained or will retain, as a condition of the transfer or sale, permanent property interests on the land providing public access to or along the sea.

(2) Equivalent or greater public access to the same beach or shoreline area is provided for than would be feasible if the land were to remain in state ownership.

(3) The land to be transferred or sold is an environmentally sensitive area with natural resources that would be adversely impacted by public use, and the state will retain permanent property interests in the land that may be necessary to protect, or otherwise provide for the permanent protection of, those resources prior to or as a condition of the transfer or sale.

(4) The land to be transferred or sold has neither existing nor potential public accessway to the sea.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the management responsibilities of state resource agencies, including, but not limited to, the responsibilities to ensure public safety and implement the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code).

(e) As used in this section, “state land” means any real property in which the state or any state agency has an ownership interest including, but not limited to, a fee, title, easement, deed restriction, or other interest in land. It does not include land in which a city, county, city and county, or district has an ownership interest.

(f) Nothing in this section is intended to restrict a private property owner’s right to sell or transfer private property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 822, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, no coastal development permit shall be required pursuant to this chapter for the following types of development and in the following areas:

(a) Improvements to existing single-family residences; provided, however, that the commission shall specify, by regulation, those classes of development which involve a risk of adverse environmental effect and shall require that a coastal development permit be obtained pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Improvements to any structure other than a single-family residence or a public works facility; provided, however, that the commission shall specify, by regulation, those types of improvements which (1) involve a risk of adverse environmental effect, (2) adversely affect public access, or (3) involve a change in use contrary to any policy of this division. Any improvement so specified by the commission shall require a coastal development permit.

(c) Maintenance dredging of existing navigation channels or moving dredged material from those channels to a disposal area outside the coastal zone, pursuant to a permit from the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

(d) Repair or maintenance activities that do not result in an addition to, or enlargement or expansion of, the object of those repair or maintenance activities; provided, however, that if the commission determines that certain extraordinary methods of repair and maintenance involve a risk of substantial adverse environmental impact, it shall, by regulation, require that a permit be obtained pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Any category of development, or any category of development within a specifically defined geographic area, that the commission, after public hearing, and by two-thirds vote of its appointed members, has described or identified and with respect to which the commission has found that there is no potential for any significant adverse effect, either individually or cumulatively, on coastal resources or on public access to, or along, the coast and, where the exclusion precedes certification of the applicable local coastal program, that the exclusion will not impair the ability of local government to prepare a local coastal program.

(f) The installation, testing, and placement in service or the replacement of any necessary utility connection between an existing service facility and any development approved pursuant to this division; provided, however, that the commission may, where necessary, require reasonable conditions to mitigate any adverse impacts on coastal resources, including scenic resources.

(g) (1) The replacement of any structure, other than a public works facility, destroyed by a disaster. The replacement structure shall conform to applicable existing zoning requirements, shall be for the same use as the destroyed structure, shall not exceed either the floor area, height, or bulk of the destroyed structure by more than 10 percent, and shall be sited in the same location on the affected property as the destroyed structure.
